Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1523
Intervening claimants; proceedings before jury to ascertain title; levy notwithstanding verdict; bond.

If the jury shall find the property, or any part thereof, to be in the claimant, and the plaintiff in execution shall, at any time within three days after said trial, tender to the sheriff or other officer having such property in his custody on execution, an undertaking, with good and sufficient sureties, payable to such claimant, in double the amount of the value of such property as assessed by the jury, to the effect that they will pay all damages sustained by reason of the detention or sale of such property, then the sheriff or other officer shall deliver said undertaking to claimant, and proceed to sell such property as if no such trial of the right of property had taken place, and shall not be liable to the claimant therefor.

R.S.1867, Code § 488, p. 475;

R.S.1913, § 8064;

C.S.1922, § 9005;

C.S.1929, § 20-1523;

R.S.1943, § 25-1523.

Proceedings are not final adjudication of claimant's rights. Fidler v. Adair, 109 Neb. 404, 191 N.W. 683 (1922).